Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2735.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $400,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for a grant to MAD DADS of Minneapolis to implement a youth workforce development program for ages 16 to 24 with a focus on underserved communities. This earn-to-learn initiative must provide career exploration opportunities, hands-on job training, mentorships, and certification pathways in high-demand industries. The program must include training in fields including but not limited to HVAC, energy efficiency, and solar panel installation. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end